Florida, session 2026, SB2504.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 8 9 Section 1.âAll collective bargaining issues for which 10 negotiations have reached an impasse for the 2026-2027 fiscal 11 year between the state and the legal representatives of the 12 certified bargaining units for state employees shall be resolved 13 pursuant to the instructions provided in the General 14 Appropriations Act and the relevant provisions of any 15 legislation enacted to implement the General Appropriations Act 16 for the 2026-2027 fiscal year. 17 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.